Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.05.010

Short title—2017 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 735).

Chapter 1, Laws of 2017 is known and may be cited as the "government of, by, and for the people act."

[ 2017 c 1 s 9 (Initiative Measure No. 735, approved November 8, 2016).]